District of Columbia statutes.
39-205.01

Arts and Humanities Enterprise Fund; establishment; accounting; investment.

(a)

There is established the Arts and Humanities Enterprise Fund (“Fund”) to be operated by the Commission.

(a-1)

There shall be deposited into the Fund:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

Interest earned on money deposited into the Fund.

(3)

Private donations, gifts, and grants; and

(4)

Proceeds of the sale or loan of works of arts, prints, and promotional items.

(a-2)

Repealed.

(b)

The monies in the Fund shall not be a part of, nor lapse into, the General Fund of the District or any other fund of the District.

(c)

By October 1st of each year, the Commission shall publish in the District of Columbia Register and in a report submitted to the Council, a specific accounting of how monies in the Fund were expended and any remaining balance. The accounting shall include the following:

(1)

The name of any donors or anonymous contributions;

(2)

The amounts of each contribution;

(3)

A description of any donated property; and

(4)

Identification of the programs or recreation centers where the funds have been expended.

(d)

Proceeds in the Fund may be expended for the administration, improvement, and maintenance of property and programs managed by the Commission.

(e)

Proceeds in the Fund may be invested in a prudent and reasonable manner consistent with applicable District government policies and procedures.

(f)

Repealed.

History

Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-22, § 6a
as added Jan. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-42, § 2(c), 44 DCR 5577
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 29, 46 DCR 2118
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2002(b), 57 DCR 6242
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7242, 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7044, 61 DCR 9990

Section References

This section is referenced in § 39-202 and § 47-2002.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2005.1.
1981 Ed., § 31-2005.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-223 added subsec. (a-1).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added (a-1)(1) and (a-1)(2), and redesignated former (a-1)(1) and (a-1)(2) as (a-1)(3) and (a-1)(4), respectively; and added (a-2) and (f).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 repealed (a-1)(1), (a-2), and (f).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2002(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7242 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7242 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7054 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7044 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7044 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Short Title

Section 7241 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle X of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Dedicated Funding for the Commission on Arts and Humanities Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.